Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2458
Special administrator; who may be appointed.

(a) If a special administrator is to be appointed pending the probate of a will which is the subject of a pending application or petition for probate, the person named personal representative in the will shall be appointed if available and qualified.

(b) In other cases, any proper person may be appointed special administrator.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 136, UPC § 3-615;

Laws 1978, LB 650, § 36.